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CIRCUIT INSPECTION

DTC C0200 /3 1 toC02 15 / 3 4 SpeedSensorCircuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The speed sensor detects wheel speed and sends the ap-
propriate signals to the ECU. These signals are used for control
ofboth theABS&BA&TRC&VSCcontrol system.The front
and rear rotors each have 48 serrations.
When the rotors rotate, themagnetic fieldemittedby theperma-
nent magnet in the speed sensor generates an AC voltage.
Since the frequency of this AC voltage changes in direct propor-
tion to the speed of the rotor, the frequency is used by the ECU
to detect the speed of each wheel.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C0200 /3 1
C0205 /32
C0210 / 3 3
C0215 / 3 4

Detectionofanyofconditions 1. through4.:
1.Atvehiclespeedof 10km/h (6mph)ormore,pulsesare

not input for 15sec.
2.Momentary interruptionof thespeedsensorsignaloc-

cursat least7 times in the timebetweenswitching the
ignitionswitchONandswitching itOFF.

3.Continuousnoiseoccurs into thespeedsensorsignals
with thevehiclespeedat20km/h ( 12mph)ormore.

4. The condition that the speed sensor signal circuit is
opencontinues for0. 12sec.ormore.

SRight front, left front, right rearand left rearspeedsensor
SEachspeedsensorcircuit
SSensor rotor

HINT:
DTCNo.C0200 /3 1 is for the right frontspeedsensor.
DTC No. C0205 / 32 is for the left front speed sensor.
DTCNo.C02 10 /33 is for the right rearspeedsensor.
DTCNo.C02 15 /34 is for the left rearspeedsensor.
Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the speed sensor circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and prohibits
ABS & BA & TRC & VSC controls and the brake system becomes normal.
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Start the inspection fromstep 1 incaseofusing thehand −held testerandstart fromstep2 incaseofnot
using thehand −held tester.

1 Checkoutputvalueofspeedsensor.

PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchONandpush thehand −held testermainswitchON.
(c)Select theDATALISTmodeon thehand −held tester.
CHECK:
Check that there is no difference between the speed value output from the speed sensor displayed on the
hand−held testerand thespeedvaluedisplayedon thespeedometerwhendriving thevehicle.
OK:

There is almost no difference from the displayed speed value.
HINT:
There is toleranceof ± 10%in thespeedometer indication.

OK Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU.

NG

2 Check speed sensor.

Front:
PREPARATION:
(a)Makesure that there isno loosenessat theconnector

lock part and connecting part of the connector.
(b) Disconnect speed sensor connector.
CHECK:
S LHside:

Measure resistance between terminals 2 and 4 of speed
sensor connector.

S RHside:
Measure resistancebetween terminals 1 and2ofspeed
sensor connector.

OK:
Resistance:0.92 − 1.22k �

CHECK:
S LHside:

Measure resistance between terminals 2 and 4 of speed
sensor connector and body ground.

S RHside:
Measure resistancebetween terminals 1 and2ofspeed
sensor connector and body ground.
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OK:
Resistance: 1 M � or higher

Rear:
PREPARATION:
(a) Make sure that there is no looseness at the connector

lock part and connecting part of the connector.
(b) Disconnect speed sensor connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of speed sensor
connector.
OK:

Resistance: 1.0 − 1.4 k�
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminal 1 or 2 of speed sensor
connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M� or higher

NG Replace speed sensor.

NOTICE:
Check the speed sensor signal last (See page DI−4) .

OK

3 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between each speed
sensor and ECU (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
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4 Check sensor installation.

CHECK:
Check the speed sensor installation.
OK:

The installation bolt is tightened properly and there is
no clearance between the sensor and front steering
knuckle or rear axle shaft.

NG Replace speed sensor.

NOTICE:
Check the speed sensor signal last (See page DI−4) .

OK

5 Check speed sensor and sensor rotor serrations.

(REFERENCE) INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE
PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU.
(b) Connect the oscilloscope to the each of terminals FR+,

FL+, RR+ or RL+ and GND of the ABS & BA & TRC & VSC
ECU.

CHECK:
Drive the vehicle at about 20 km/h (12 mph), and check the sig-
nal waveform.

OK Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU.

NG
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6 Check sensor rotor and sensor tip.

Front:
PREPARATION:
Remove front axle hub (See Pub No. RM616E on page SA−21).
CHECK:
Check the sensor rotor serrations.
OK:

No scratches, missing teeth or foreign objects.
PREPARATION:
Remove front speed sensor (See Pub No. RM616E on page
BR−89).
CHECK:
Check the sensor tip.
OK:

No scratches or foreign objects on the sensor tip.

Rear:
PREPARATION:
Remove the rear axle shaft (See Pub No. RM616E on page
SA−161).
CHECK:
Check the sensor rotor serrations.
OK:

No scratches, missing teeth or foreign objects.
PREPARATION:
Remove rear speed sensor (See Pub No. RM616E on page
BR−92).
CHECK:
Check the sensor tip.
OK:

No scratches or foreign objects on the sensor tip.

NG Replace speed sensor or rotor.

NOTICE:
Check the speed sensor signal last (See page DI−4) .

OK

Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC
ECU.


